North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 22G. Candidate-Specific Communications. [Repealed]

§§ 163-278.100 through 163-278.103.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-381, s. 48.1, effective January 1, 2014.

History.
S. 163-278.100; 2006-233, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 29(e); 2009-534, s. 9(a), (b); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.1, effective January 1, 2014; s. 163-278.101; 2006-233, s. 1; repealed by 2013-281, s. 48.1, effective January 1, 2014;
s. 163-278.102; 2006-233, s. 1; 2006-259, s. 29(c); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.1, effective January 1, 2014. s. 163-278.103; 2009-534, s. 9(c); repealed by 2013-381, s. 48.1, effective January 1, 2014.

§§ 163-278.104 through 163-278.109.

Reserved for future codification purposes.